Hawaii, session 2026, HB2418.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 302A-801, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (f) to read as follows: "(f)  The board may employ an executive director for a term of up to four years, who shall be appointed by the board of education, with the advice and consent of the senate, and without regard to chapters 76 and 89; provided that the board of education shall appoint the executive director from a list of three nominees submitted by the board [shall submit a nominee] to the board of education [for approval or disapproval]; provided further that if the senate fails to confirm the nominee [is disapproved], the board of education shall submit another nominee to the [board of education] senate for [approval or disapproval.] advice and consent. The board may terminate the executive director's contract for cause; provided that the board shall submit the recommendation for termination to the board of education for approval or disapproval." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________